Utah statutes.
19-6-605.   Disposal by battery wholesaler.

(1)  A person selling lead acid batteries at wholesale may not dispose of a used lead acid battery except by delivery to:

(a)  a battery manufacturer for delivery to a secondary lead smelter that meets the state and federal permit requirements;

(b)  a collection or recycling facility; or

(c)  a secondary lead smelter that meets the state and federal permit requirements.

(2)  The wholesale lead acid battery distributor shall ensure removal of batteries received under Section 19-6-602 or 19-6-604 from the wholesale collection point.

